North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-02 Workforce Safety and Insurance Organization
65-02-33.
Occupational health and preventive medicine programs — Continuing appropriation.

The organization may establish and implement programs to advance occupational health and preventive medicine in this state and to protect the integrity of the fund. These programs may include the provision of education or training, consultation, grants, scholarships, or other incentives that promote superior care and treatment of the workforce in this state. Funds in the workforce and insurance fund are appropriated to the organization on a continuing basis for the purpose of funding the programs implemented under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 47, § 6; 2009, ch. 611, § 8.

65-02-34.
Spending authority — Limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 611, § 13.

65-02-35.
Attorney’s fees for legal review in preparation for rehearing of an administrative order.

The organization shall pay an injured employee’s attorney for the fees and costs to consult with the injured employee regarding a request for rehearing of an administrative order issued by the organization under section 65-01-16 and chapter 28-32. The attorney’s fees and costs under this section are for the purpose of an initial consultation and review of the claimant’s case and are separate from and independent of the attorney’s fees and costs provided for under section 65-02-08. To be eligible for payment of attorney’s fees and costs under this section, before consulting the attorney the injured employee must first receive a certificate of completion from the decision review office, and the attorney consultation must take place after the certificate of completion is issued but before the rehearing is conducted.

Payment of attorney’s fees and costs under this section is limited as follows:

An injured employee may consult with one attorney per administrative order;

The payment amount for attorney’s fees may not exceed a total of five hundred dollars per injured employee, per administrative order;

The payment amount for costs may not exceed a total of one hundred fifty dollars per injured employee, per administrative order;

The attorney must be licensed to practice law in North Dakota and must be in good standing; and

The organization may deny fees and costs the organization determines to be excessive or frivolous.

To obtain payment under this section, an attorney shall submit to the organization a fee statement. The fee statement must be signed by the attorney and must include:

The name of the injured employee;

The workforce safety and insurance claim number;

The date of the billing statement;

A summary of the basic legal issue;

The date of each service or charge being billed;

An itemization and a reasonable description of the legal work performed for each service or charge;

The time and amount billed for each item; and

The total time and amounts billed.

Under this section, the organization shall reimburse the following costs:

Actual postage, if postage exceeds three dollars per parcel;

Actual toll charges for long-distance telephone calls;

Copying charges at eight cents per page;

Mileage and other expenses for reasonable and necessary travel, including per diem, all of which are to be paid in the amounts paid state officials as provided under sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09; and

Other reasonable and necessary costs, not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars.

Under this section, the organization may not reimburse the following costs:

Express mail;

Additional copies of transcripts;

Costs incurred to obtain medical records;

Copy charges for documents provided by the organization; and

Costs for typing and clerical or office services.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 617, § 1; 2013, ch. 63, § 15.

65-02-36.
Attorney’s fees for legal review of proposed settlement.

The organization shall pay up to five hundred dollars to an attorney for review of a proposed settlement offered to an injured employee, if the employee to whom the settlement is offered was not represented by an attorney at the time the offer was made. Subdivisions d and e of subsection 2 of section 65-02-35 apply to the payment of fees under this section. The organization may reimburse an attorney for costs under this section according to subsections 3, 4, and 5 of section 65-02-35. Fees and costs under this section are payable regardless of whether the injured employee accepts the settlement proposal.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 617, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

65-02-37.
Attorney’s fees reimbursement.

An employer that is insured and in good standing with the organization is eligible for reimbursement of reasonable legal costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if the employer is found to be uninsured or noncompliant by the workers’ compensation authorities of another state and hires an attorney to defend against the determination. A reimbursement may be made only if the organization determines the employer’s employees did not regularly work in the other state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 503, § 1, effective March 15, 2021.

65-02-38.
Electronic transaction payment fees — Continuing appropriation.

Money in the workforce safety and insurance fund is appropriated on a continuing basis for payment of fees associated with credit or debit card payments made to the organization.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 503, § 2, effective March 15, 2021.

65-02-39.
Fees for outgoing file copies.

The organization may charge a fee not exceeding twenty dollars for the first twenty-five pages and seventy-five cents per page after twenty-five pages when providing an outgoing file copy. In an electronic, digital, or other computerized format, the organization may charge a fee of thirty dollars for the first twenty-five pages and twenty-five cents per page after twenty-five pages. The fees include any administration cost, retrieval fee, or postage expense.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 500, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.